North Carolina, session 2025, HB756.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to the Harmony Empowerment
Life Center, a nonprofit organization, to help expand their "Never Limit An Athlete's Mind"
program which aids minorities and their families to improve mental health and prepare them for
future opportunities into Wake, Durham, Forsyth, Guilford, Mecklenburg, Union, and Anson
Counties.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H756-v-1*